Utah statutes.
31A-9-104.   Applicability of other insurance laws to fraternals.

(1)  No section of Chapter 5 applies to fraternals unless it is specifically made applicable by this chapter.

(2)  Each section of the Insurance Code, other than in Chapter 5, that applies to mutuals subject to Chapter 5, also applies to domestic and nondomestic fraternals unless:

(a)  this chapter or the particular section provides otherwise; or

(b)  the particular section is inconsistent with a provision applying explicitly to fraternals, in this chapter or elsewhere.

